New York, session 2025-2026, A9171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 297 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 11 to read as follows: 3 11. (a) The division shall maintain through its website a publicly 4 accessible electronic interface that reports findings of unlawful 5 discriminatory practices relating to lawful sources of income. Such 6 report shall include, to the extent permitted by law: 7 (i) the name of each respondent found liable for source of income 8 discrimination under this article; 9 (ii) the date of the final determination or order; 10 (iii) the geographic location of the housing at issue; and 11 (iv) the amount of any monetary penalty or other relief imposed as a 12 result of such finding. 13 (b) The division shall update the information under paragraph (a) of 14 this subdivision no less than quarterly and may redact identifying 15 details of individual complainants as necessary to protect privacy. 16 § 2. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 235-k to 17 read as follows: 18 § 235-k. Reporting on rental applications by subsidy holders. 1. Any 19 landlord who owns or operates more than six residential rental units in 20 the state shall, on an annual basis, report to the division of housing 21 and community renewal the following information in a form and manner 22 prescribed by the commissioner: 23 (a) the total number of rental applications received during the prior 24 calendar year; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13899-01-5 A. 9171 2 1 (b) the number of such applications submitted by individuals using a 2 rental subsidy, including but not limited to a Section 8 voucher, city 3 family homelessness and eviction prevention supplement, family homeless- 4 ness and eviction prevention supplement, state family homelessness and 5 eviction prevention supplement, or other rental subsidy under a recog- 6 nized rental assistance program; 7 (c) the number of such subsidy-holder applicants who were offered a 8 lease or tenancy; and 9 (d) the number of such applicants who were denied housing, and a 10 brief, non-identifying explanation of the reason for such denial, to the 11 extent not prohibited by law. 12 2. The division of housing and community renewal shall make such data 13 publicly available in an aggregated and anonymized form, disaggregated 14 by zip code, property owner, and building where feasible. 15 3. The division of housing and community renewal may promulgate rules 16 and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 18 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 19 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 20 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 21 completed on or before such effective date.